Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-1022
Distribution of income tax receipts and state aid; effect on budget.

(1) On or before May 1, 2020, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine the amounts to be distributed to each local system for the ensuing school fiscal year pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and shall certify the amounts to the Director of Administrative Services, the Auditor of Public Accounts, and each local system. On or before May 1, 2020, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall report the necessary funding level for the ensuing school fiscal year to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, and the Education Committee of the Legislature. The report submitted to the committees of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, certified state aid amounts, including adjustments pursuant to section 79-1065.02, shall be shown as budgeted non-property-tax receipts and deducted prior to calculating the property tax request in the local system's general fund budget statement as provided to the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to section 79-1024.

(2) Except as provided in this subsection, subsection (8) of section 79-1016, and sections 79-1005, 79-1033, and 79-1065.02, the amounts certified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed in ten as nearly as possible equal payments on the last business day of each month beginning in September of each ensuing school fiscal year and ending in June of the following year, except that when a local system is to receive a monthly payment of less than one thousand dollars, such payment shall be one lump-sum payment on the last business day of December during the ensuing school fiscal year.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 79;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 84;

Laws 1994, LB 1290, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 1310, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 840, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3813;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 668;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 30;

Laws 1997, LB 710, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 713, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 806, § 51;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 28;

Laws 1999, LB 149, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 35;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 23;

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 12;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 4, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 67, § 12;

Laws 2003, LB 540, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 67;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 47;

Laws 2005, LB 198, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 86;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2007, LB21, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 28;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 41;

Laws 2009, LB61, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 15;

Laws 2009, LB548, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB711, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 19;

Laws 2011, LB18, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB633, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 159;

Laws 2013, LB408, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB838, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 43;

Laws 2017, LB119, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB430, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB880, § 1.
February 13, 2020